Illinois, session 104th, HB3191.
Be it enacted by the People of the State of Illinois, 3represented in the General Assembly: 4    Section 1. Short title. This Act may be cited as the Youth 5Protection and Nicotine Accountability Act. 6    Section 5. Findings and purpose.7    (a) The General Assembly finds that:8        (1) In 2024, Elf Bar was the most commonly reported 9    brand among youth e-cigarette users, with 36.1% of middle 10    and high school students using the brand.11        (2) More than 8 in 10 youth e-cigarette users report 12    using flavored products, with fruit, candy, and menthol 13    being the most popular.14        (3) Over half (54.6%) of students using e-cigarettes 15    prefer products labeled with "ice" or "iced" flavors.16        (4) Disposables represent the most-used device type, 17    accounting for 55.6% of youth usage.18        (5) 38.4% of youth e-cigarette users report frequent 19    use, with 26.3% using daily.20        (6) Poison control centers reported over 7,000 21    vaping-related exposures from April 2022 to March 2023, 22    with nearly 90% involving children under 5 years of age.23        (7) Numerous studies have shown that higher taxation   HB3191- 2 -LRB104 08849 BDA 18904 b1    on nicotine products, including e-cigarettes, reduces 2    consumption, especially among youth. By taxing 3    nicotine-containing products at an equivalent rate, 4    Illinois will close the tax disparity, making e-cigarettes 5    equally less affordable to both youth and adults, thus 6    decreasing nicotine exposure and discouraging youth 7    uptake.8        (8) The use of nicotine products, particularly among 9    youth, has led to significant public health concerns, 10    including increased hospitalizations, poison control 11    center reports, and adverse health events.12    (b) Therefore, the purposes of this Act are as follows:13        (1) This Act aims to mitigate the rising prevalence of 14    youth e-cigarette use by addressing flavored nicotine 15    products, increasing taxation parity, enforcing marketing 16    and access restrictions, and investing in public health 17    programs.18        (2) This Act aims to ensure equal taxation on all 19    nicotine-containing products in Illinois. By taxing 20    electronic cigarettes (e-cigarettes) at a rate equivalent 21    to that of traditional combustible cigarettes, this 22    legislation will eliminate existing discrepancies between 23    e-cigarette taxes and traditional cigarette taxes. The 24    goal is to increase the tax rate on e-cigarettes, 25    discouraging youth consumption and reducing affordability.26        (3) This Act aims to establish a centralized system   HB3191- 3 -LRB104 08849 BDA 18904 b1    that will collect, track, and analyze data on nicotine 2    exposure to enhance public health responses and inform 3    policy-making. 4    Section 10. Definitions. In this Act:5    "Characterizing flavor" means a distinguishable taste or 6aroma, other than the taste or aroma of tobacco, imparted 7either prior to or during consumption of a tobacco product or 8electronic cigarette. "Characterizing flavor" includes, but is 9not limited to, tastes or aromas relating to any fruit, 10chocolate, vanilla, honey, candy, cocoa, dessert, alcoholic 11beverage, herb, or spice, or any product that produces a 12cooling or numbing sensation.13    "Electronic cigarette" or "e-cigarette" has the meaning 14given to the term "electronic cigarette" in Section 10-5 of 15the Tobacco Products Tax Act of 1995.16    "Flavored electronic cigarette" means any electronic 17cigarette or component thereof that imparts a characterizing 18flavor other than tobacco. "Flavored electronic cigarette" 19includes, but is not limited to, menthol, mint, wintergreen, 20fruit, chocolate, vanilla, honey, candy, cocoa, dessert, 21alcoholic beverage, herb, or spice, or any product that 22produces a cooling or numbing sensation.23    "Nicotine Exposure Reporting Database" means a centralized 24digital system established by the Department of Public Health 25for collecting and analyzing data related to nicotine exposure   HB3191- 4 -LRB104 08849 BDA 18904 b1incidents.2    "Youth" means any individual under the age of 21 residing 3in Illinois. 4    Section 15. Prohibition of flavored electronic cigarettes; 5inspections; penalties; home rule.6    (a) No person, retailer, or entity shall sell, offer for 7sale, distribute, or possess with the intent to sell or 8distribute any flavored electronic cigarette within the State 9of Illinois.10    (b) The manufacture, sale, or distribution of any 11electronic cigarette that contains an additive or synthetic 12chemical that creates a characterizing flavor, including 13menthol or any cooling or numbing sensation, is prohibited.14    (c) Licensed retailers of tobacco products and electronic 15cigarettes shall permit the Department of Public Health, local 16health departments, or any authorized designee to conduct 17unannounced inspections of any facilities, vehicles, or 18records relevant to compliance with this Act. Refusal to allow 19an inspection shall constitute a violation of this Act and may 20result in penalties as described in subsections (e) and (f) of 21this Section.22    (d) The Department of Public Health, in conjunction with 23local health departments, shall have the authority to enforce 24the provisions of this Act.25    (e) Any person or entity found to be in violation of this   HB3191- 5 -LRB104 08849 BDA 18904 b1Act shall be subject to a civil penalty of not less than $500 2for the first violation, $1,000 for the second violation 3within a 24-month period, and $2,000 for each subsequent 4violation within a 24-month period.5    (f) In addition to monetary penalties, notwithstanding any 6provision of any law, subject to the requirements of due 7process, violations of this Act may result in the suspension 8or revocation of any license or permit issued to the person or 9entity by the State of Illinois or any of its agencies.10    (g) Nothing in this Act shall preempt or otherwise 11prohibit the adoption of any local ordinance or regulation 12that imposes more restrictive requirements on the sale or 13distribution of flavored electronic cigarettes. A unit of 14local government, including a home rule unit, may not regulate 15the sale or distribution of flavored electronic cigarettes in 16a manner less restrictive than the regulation by the State of 17flavored electronic cigarettes under this Section. This 18Section is a limitation under subsection (i) of Section 6 of 19Article VII of the Illinois Constitution on the concurrent 20exercise by home rule units of powers and functions exercised 21by the State.22    (h) The Department of Public Health shall adopt rules 23implementing this Section. 24    Section 20. Youth Protection and Nicotine Accountability 25Fund. The Illinois Youth Protection and Nicotine   HB3191- 6 -LRB104 08849 BDA 18904 b1Accountability Fund is created as a special fund in the State 2treasury. Revenue generated from the tax on e-cigarettes under 3Section 25 of this Act or rules adopted under Section 25 of 4this Act shall be collected by the Department of Revenue and 5deposited into the Fund. Civil penalties collected under 6Section 15 of this Act or rules adopted under Section of this 7Act shall be deposited into the Fund. Proceeds from interest 8or dividends shall be reinvested into the Fund. Moneys in the 9Fund, as directed by the Department of Public Health, may be 10used to fund public health initiatives, tobacco prevention 11programs, and youth-focused educational campaigns aimed at 12reducing nicotine consumption or for other purposes under this 13Act or rules adopted under this Act. 14    Section 25. Tax on e-cigarettes. 15    (a) Beginning January 1, 2026, a tax is imposed upon 16purchasers of e-cigarettes containing nicotine for the 17privilege of using e-cigarettes containing nicotine at the 18rate of $2.98 per e-cigarette. The Department of Revenue 19shall, by rule, modify this rate or establish rates based on 20quantity, volume, or other factors, if necessary, in order to 21establish equivalent rates to the taxes for cigarettes under 22the Cigarette Tax Act and the Cigarette Use Tax Act to ensure 23fairness and equity across all nicotine products. The 24procedure for the collection of the tax shall be set by rule by 25the Department of Revenue. Revenue generated from the tax   HB3191- 7 -LRB104 08849 BDA 18904 b1under this Section shall be deposited into the Illinois Youth 2Protection and Nicotine Accountability Fund.3    (b) A retailer may not intentionally misclassify an 4e-cigarette to evade taxation.5    (c) A retailer may not fail to collect and remit the tax 6under this Section or rules adopted under this Section.7    (d) The Department of Revenue shall adopt rules for the 8enforcement of the tax under this Section with respect to 9sales of e-cigarettes, including online sales. Retailers must 10collect and remit taxes on all sales made to Illinois 11residents to the Department of Revenue.12    (e) Any retailer who violates any provision of this 13Section or rules adopted under this Section shall be subject 14to a civil penalty of $10,000 per violation, and seizure of any 15products subject to the tax under this Section.16    (f) The Department of Revenue shall adopt rules 17implementing this Section. 18    Section 30. Comprehensive Nicotine and Tobacco Prevention 19and Awareness Education. 20    (a) The Department of Public Health shall, by rule, in 21consultation with the State Board of Education, develop 22educational curricula, Comprehensive Nicotine Tobacco 23Prevention and Awareness Education, suitable for secondary 24school students in this State. All secondary schools in the 25State of Illinois subject to the jurisdiction of the State   HB3191- 8 -LRB104 08849 BDA 18904 b1Board of Education shall, according to rule adopted by the 2Department of Public Health, provide this curricula to 3students.4        (1) This curricula shall accomplish the following 5    objectives:6            (A) Educate students on the health risks 7        associated with nicotine and tobacco use, with a focus 8        on vaping and e-cigarettes. 9            (B) Debunk common myths, such as the mistaken 10        belief that vaping is a safe alternative to smoking.11            (C) Highlight the tactics used by tobacco and 12        vaping companies to target youth through marketing and 13        product design.14            (D) Provide actionable prevention and cessation 15        strategies for students.16            (E) Develop media literacy to critically analyze 17        advertisements and social media influence related to 18        vaping.19        (2) This curricula may include the following topics:20            (A) Health Risks: Physical and mental health 21        consequences of nicotine and tobacco use, including 22        addiction, lung damage, and cardiovascular issues.23            (B) Vaping and E-Cigarettes: How vaping devices 24        work, ingredients in e-liquids, and the rise of 25        disposable vapes like Elf Bar.26            (C) Prevention Strategies: Peer refusal skills,   HB3191- 9 -LRB104 08849 BDA 18904 b1        coping mechanisms for stress, and fostering a 2        supportive, smoke-free school environment.3            (D) Youth Cessation Programs: Access to resources 4        such as counseling, quit lines, and digital tools for 5        quitting nicotine use.6            (E) Public Health Campaigns: Examples of 7        successful anti-tobacco and anti-vaping campaigns and 8        how they address youth audiences.9            (F) Media and Marketing Awareness: How tobacco and 10        vape companies target youth through social media, 11        flavors, and product designs.12            (G) Legal and Policy Implications: Overview of 13        federal and State laws regulating nicotine and tobacco 14        products, emphasizing youth protection measures.15    (b) The Department of Public Health shall launch a 16statewide campaign targeting schools and youth organizations 17to support the implementation of this Section, ensuring 18students and educators understand its importance.19    (c) The Department of Public Health may expend moneys from 20the Illinois Youth Protection and Nicotine Accountability Fund 21in carrying out the requirements of this Section. The 22Department of Public Health may seek funding from State 23appropriations, federal grants, and other available resources 24to develop, implement, maintain, and expand the Comprehensive 25Nicotine Tobacco Prevention and Awareness Education curricula 26and related requirements under this Section.   HB3191- 10 -LRB104 08849 BDA 18904 b1    Section 35. Illinois Nicotine Exposure Reporting Database. 2    (a) The Department of Public Health shall establish and 3maintain the Illinois Nicotine Exposure Reporting Database. 4This database will serve as the central repository for 5tracking and monitoring:6        (1) Poison Control Center Reports: The database shall 7    include data from poison control centers concerning 8    incidents related to e-cigarettes, vaping products, and 9    other nicotine delivery devices.10        (2) Youth Hospitalizations: The database shall include 11    data related to hospitalizations among youth caused by 12    nicotine exposure will be collected and analyzed.13        (3) Trends in Nicotine-Related Adverse Events: The 14    database shall track trends in adverse health outcomes 15    directly linked to the use of nicotine products, 16    including, but not limited to, cardiovascular 17    complications, respiratory issues, and addiction-related 18    health consequences.19    (b) All healthcare facilities, poison control centers, 20schools, and other authorized reporting entities in Illinois 21must provide necessary data and reports related to nicotine 22exposure incidents as requested by the Department of Public 23Health. The Department of Public Health shall work with local 24health departments, schools, hospitals, and other relevant 25agencies to ensure comprehensive and accurate data collection.  HB3191- 11 -LRB104 08849 BDA 18904 b1    (c) The Department of Public Health shall publish annual 2updates on the findings from the database, including:3        (1) Trends in youth nicotine exposure.4        (2) Rates of hospitalizations linked to vaping.5        (3) Poison control center reports related to nicotine.6        (4) Regional and statewide statistics on 7    nicotine-related adverse events.8        (5) Demographic breakdowns of affected populations.9    These updates shall be made publicly available via the 10Department of Public Health Internet website, local health 11department reports, and accessible to policymakers, schools, 12and advocacy groups.13    (d) All data collected under this Section shall adhere to 14strict confidentiality standards. The Department of Public 15Health will implement secure data handling procedures to 16ensure that individual identities are protected and that 17reports are used solely for public health analysis and policy 18development.19    (e) The Department of Public Health may expend moneys from 20the Illinois Youth Protection and Nicotine Accountability Fund 21in carrying out the requirements of this Section. The 22Department of Public Health may seek funding from State 23appropriations, federal grants, and other available resources 24to implement, maintain, and expand the Nicotine Exposure 25Reporting Database as necessary.26    (f) The Department of Public Health shall submit a report   HB3191- 12 -LRB104 08849 BDA 18904 b1to the Governor and the General Assembly within 10 years after 2the effective date of this Act reviewing the effects of this 3Section and providing any recommendations necessary. This 4Section is inoperative on and after the date that is 10 years 5after the effective date of this Act. 6    Section 97. Severability. The provisions of this Act are 7severable under Section 1.31 of the Statute on Statutes. 8    Section 99. Effective date. This Act takes effect upon 9becoming law.